Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska
88-552
Nebraska Grain
Warehouse Surveillance Cash Fund; created; use; investment.

There is hereby created in the state treasury a fund to be known
as the Nebraska Grain Warehouse Surveillance Cash Fund. Such fund shall be
used solely for disbursing funds and receiving reimbursement for services
performed by the commission in the suspension or termination of a warehouse
operation, except that transfers
may be made from the fund to the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature.
All money received by the commission for such services shall be remitted to
the State Treasurer for credit to the Nebraska
Grain Warehouse Surveillance Cash Fund. Any money in the fund
available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer
pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds
Investment Act.

Laws 1986, LB 137, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1981), § 88-502.02;

Laws 1987, LB 164, § 28;

Laws 1995, LB 7, § 154;

Laws 2009, First Spec. Sess., LB3, § 100.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.